Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-367
Rebates; violation; license; revocation; appeal.

The license of any insurance company, agent, or broker found by the Department of Insurance, after hearing, to have violated section 44-361 may be revoked or suspended. Appeal may be taken from the decision of the Director of Insurance, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 144, p. 469;

R.S.1913, § 3281;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XI, § 9, p. 650;

C.S.1922, § 7888;

C.S.1929, § 44-1109;

Laws 1935, c. 97, § 2, p. 325;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-1109;

R.S.1943, § 44-367;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 16, p. 1274;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 46;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 104.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.